Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-670
Federal law; adjudged unconstitutional, invalid, or stayed; effect.

If Public Law 94-566 or the federal acts it amends is adjudged unconstitutional or invalid in its application or stayed pendente lite by any court of competent jurisdiction, then the coverage under the Employment Security Law of those employees of any political subdivision is automatically stayed or repealed.

Laws 1977, LB 509, § 10;

Laws 1985, LB 339, § 52.